Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1021
Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Fund; created; investment.

The Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Fund is created. The fund shall receive dedicated income tax appropriations and appropriations made by the Legislature to fund the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act and shall be administered by the state board. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1990, LB 1059, § 12;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 94;

Laws 1995, LB 840, § 8;

R.S.Supp.,1995, § 79-3812;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 667;

Laws 1996, LB 1050, § 29;

Laws 1998, Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 27.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.